Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 30 Attorneys at Law [Repealed]

30.010.
Practice without license forbidden. [Repealed.]

30.020.
Admission of foreign attorneys. [Repealed.]

30.030.
Regulations as to admission to practice law. [Repealed.]

30.040.
Board of examiners. [Repealed.]

30.050.
Meetings and proceedings of board of bar examiners. [Repealed.]

30.060.
Disposition of examination and license fees — Compensation and expenses of board of bar examiners. [Repealed.]

30.065.
Veterans. [Repealed.]

30.070.
Bar examination, how conducted. [Repealed.]

30.080.
License, granting and revocation; copies; clerk’s fees. [Repealed.]

30.090.
Nonresident attorneys, temporary privilege of. [Repealed.]

30.100.
Persons convicted of felony not to practice. [Repealed.]

30.110.
Roster of attorneys in certain courts. [Repealed.]

30.120.
Officers who shall not practice. [Repealed.]

30.130.
Law partnerships with public officers. [Repealed.]

30.140.
Law partner of public officer, when not to practice. [Repealed.]

30.150.
County judge, when not to practice. [Repealed.]

30.160.
Law office, where not to be kept. [Repealed.]

30.170.
Court rules governing practice of law and state bar. [Repealed.]

30.180.
Liability of attorney for neglect or lack of skill. [Repealed.]

30.190.
Liability of attorney for not paying over money collected. [Repealed.]

30.200.
Fee of attorney for plaintiff — Lien for — Effect of compromise. [Repealed.]

30.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]